Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska83-920
Reentry service center pilot programs; report.

(1) Beginning October 1, 2024, the Department of Correctional Services shall electronically submit a quarterly report to the Judiciary Committee of the Legislature and the Appropriations Committee of the Legislature regarding any reentry service center pilot programs being conducted by the department. The report shall include:

(a) Information regarding residential substance abuse pilot programs, including rates of successful and unsuccessful completion by participants and information on the long-term outcomes of program participants;

(b) Information regarding parolees receiving financial assistance for transitional housing, including how long parolees are receiving such assistance or using such housing, success rates of parolees while in transitional housing, and long-term outcomes for such parolees; and

(c) Information on the number of parolees who submit more than one reentry transition living plan to the board.

(2) The report shall redact all personal identifying information of parolees.

Laws 2024, LB631, § 20.
July 19, 2024